Maryland, session 2026, HB1474.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
13–102.
This title applies only in Baltimore County.
13–1604.
(a) In this section, “eligible transferor district” means an election district in which
the total number of Class B and Class D licenses, excluding exception licenses, is 10% or
– 1 –

Ch. 832 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
greater than the total number of Class B and Class D licenses that are allowed in an
election district based on the rule of the Board that limits the total number of licenses
available in an election district by population.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, the Board may
approve the transfer of a Class B or Class D license in existence in an eligible transferor
district on June 1, 2025, to another election district if:
(i) the approval occurs anytime from June 1, 2025, to May 31, 2028,
both inclusive; and
(ii) prior to the transfer, the number of licenses in existence in the
election district to which the license is to be transferred is not greater than 25% more than
the number of licenses that would otherwise exist in that election district, based on the rule
of the Board that limits the total number of licenses available in an election district by
population.
(2) (i) The Board may not authorize the transfer of more than five Class
B or Class D licenses in existence on June 1, 2025, in total under this section.
(ii) Not more than two licenses may be transferred under this
subsection into any single election district.
(c) (6) A [Class B or D license transferred under subsection (b) of this section
or a] Class B Service Bar (SB) license issued under this subsection may not thereafter be
transferred from the licensed premises or converted to another class of license.
(e) (1) When a license is transferred from an eligible transferor district to
another election district under this section, the license does not continue to exist in the
eligible transferor district from which it was transferred.
(2) Subject to the 25% allowance authorized in subsection (b)(1)(ii) of this
section, the Board shall consider a license transferred under this section to be a regular
license and not an exception license for determining the total number of licenses available
in an election district based on the rule of the Board.
(f) [(1)] The Board[:
(i)] shall convert a Class D license that is transferred from an eligible
transferor district to any other election district to a Class B license[; and
(ii) may not thereafter transfer the Class B license from the licensed
premises or convert the license to another class of license.
(2) The Board may not transfer from a licensed premises or convert a
license to another class of license:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 832
(i) a new license issued by the Board based on an increase in
population under the rule of the Board limiting the total number of licenses available by
population; or
(ii) a license that has been revoked and reissued by the Board].
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
[13–1705.
(a) (1) Notwithstanding the license population quota limitations established
by the Board and in addition to the licenses authorized for issuance in the county, the Board
may authorize the transfer into the Towson Commercial Revitalization District, as defined
by the Baltimore County Council, of not more than 10 beer, wine, and liquor (on–sale)
licenses that:
(i) were issued on or before December 31, 2008;
(ii) were in existence in Election District 15 of the county on June 1,
2009; and
(iii) are valid on the date of transfer.
(2) To be transferred under this section, a license:
(i) shall be a Class B or a Class D license; and
(ii) may not be a license that is prohibited from being transferred by
statute or regulation.
(3) For determining the total number of licenses available in an election
district, the Board shall consider a license transferred under this section to be a regular
license and not an exception to the population and numerical limitations specified in “Rule
19 – Population and Numerical Limitations” of the Rules and Regulations of the Board.
(4) On the date of transfer, a license transferred under this section shall be
converted into a Class B beer, wine, and liquor (Towson Commercial Revitalization District)
license and may not be counted toward any population limit existing in the election district
from where it was transferred.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the license issuance
requirements, license fee, minimum square foot area requirement for food and beverage
– 3 –

Ch. 832 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
preparation and consumption, and days and hours of sale for a Class B beer, wine, and
liquor (Towson Commercial Revitalization District) (on–sale) license are the same as those
for a Class B beer, wine, and liquor (on–sale) hotel and restaurant license.
(c) (1) A Class B beer, wine, and liquor (Towson Commercial Revitalization
District) license may be issued only for a location within the Towson Commercial
Revitalization District, as defined by the Baltimore County Council.
(2) The license shall be used in conjunction with the operation of a
restaurant, as defined in this article and in the regulations of the Board.
(3) The restaurant operation shall maintain average daily receipts from
the sale of food of at least 60% of the total daily receipts of the restaurant.
(4) The seating capacity for the bar area may not exceed 25% of the total
seating capacity of the restaurant.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (d)(2)(ii) of this section, the area
dedicated to the restaurant operation shall have a minimum seating capacity of 100
individuals.
(6) The hours during which the privileges conferred by the license may be
exercised may not exceed the hours during which food is offered for sale.
(7) The license does not confer an off–sale privilege.
(d) Of the restaurants for which a Class B or Class D license may be transferred
and a Class B beer, wine, and liquor (Towson Commercial Revitalization District) license
may be issued under subsection (a)(1) of this section, the Board may require that:
(1) for not more than seven restaurants, applicants for license transfer and
issuance demonstrate a minimum capital investment, excluding the costs of the land and
building shell, of $500,000; and
(2) for not more than three restaurants:
(i) applicants for license transfer and issuance demonstrate a
capital investment, excluding the costs of the land and building shell, of not less than
$50,000 or more than $400,000; and
(ii) the area dedicated to the restaurant operation have:
1. a maximum seating capacity of 100 individuals, with the
seating capacity in the bar area not exceeding 25% of the total seating capacity of the
restaurant; and
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 832
2. a minimum seating capacity of 40 individuals.
(e) The Board shall deny an application for transfer of a Class B or Class D license
and issuance of a Class B beer, wine, and liquor (Towson Commercial Revitalization
District) license if within 2 years immediately preceding the application:
(1) (i) the applicant was a holder of an on–sale license within the
boundaries of the Towson Commercial Revitalization District; or
(ii) there was an on–sale license in existence for the proposed
premises of the applicant; and
(2) the previous on–sale license was transferred to premises outside the
Towson Commercial Revitalization District.
(f) A Class B beer, wine, and liquor (Towson Commercial Revitalization District)
license issued under this section may not be transferred from the Towson Commercial
Revitalization District or be converted into any other class of license.]
[13–1706.
(a) (1) Notwithstanding the license population quota limitations established
by the Board and in addition to the licenses authorized for issuance in the county, the Board
may authorize the transfer into the “Hunt Valley Commercial/Mixed Use Focal Point” as
designated in the Hunt Valley/Timonium Master Plan, adopted by the Baltimore County
Council on October 19, 1998, of two beer, wine, and liquor (on–sale) retail licenses that:
(i) were in existence in Election District 15 on July 1, 2004; and
(ii) are valid on the date of transfer.
(2) A license transferred under this section:
(i) may not be a Class A or C license or a license that is prohibited
from being transferred by law or local regulation other than crossing district lines;
(ii) shall be converted into a Class B (HV) license; and
(iii) as of the date of transfer, may not be counted toward any
population limit existing in Election District 15.
(3) For determining the total number of licenses available in an election
district, the Board shall consider a license transferred under this section to be a regular
license and not an exception to the population and numerical limitations specified in “Rule
19 – Population and Numerical Limitations” of the Rules and Regulations of the Board.
– 5 –

Ch. 832 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the license issuance
requirements, license fee, minimum square foot area requirement for food and beverage
preparation and consumption, and days and hours of sale for a Class B (HV) restaurant
(on–sale) beer, wine, and liquor license are the same as those provided for in this article
and in the regulations of the Board for a Class B beer, wine, and liquor (on–sale) hotel and
restaurant license.
(c) (1) A Class B (HV) restaurant (on–sale) beer, wine, and liquor retail license
may be issued only for a location within the “Hunt Valley Commercial/Mixed Use Focal
Point” as designated in the Hunt Valley/Timonium Master Plan, adopted by the Baltimore
County Council on October 19, 1998.
(2) The license shall be used in conjunction with the operation of a
restaurant, as defined in this article and the regulations of the Board.
(3) The restaurant operation shall maintain average daily receipts from
the sale of food of at least 60% of the total daily receipts of the establishment.
(4) The total seating capacity for the area dedicated primarily for the
consumption of alcoholic beverages may not exceed 25% of the total seating capacity of the
establishment.
(5) Subject to subsection (d)(5) of this section, the hours during which the
privileges conferred by the license may be exercised may not exceed the hours for which
food is offered for sale.
(d) (1) The Class B (HV) restaurant beer, wine, and liquor license authorizes
on–premises consumption.
(2) Once issued, the license may not be:
(i) transferred to a new location other than the original location for
which the license was issued; or
(ii) converted into any other class of license.
(3) Paragraph (2) of this subsection does not prohibit the transfer of
ownership of the license.
(4) The premises shall comply with all applicable zoning regulations.
(5) Alcoholic beverages may be sold in the establishment only until 1:30
a.m.
(e) The Board may not issue more than a total of three beer, wine, and liquor
licenses in the “Hunt Valley Commercial/Mixed Use Focal Point” under the exceptions in
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 832
“Rule 19 – Population and Numerical Limitations” of the Rules and Regulations of the
Board.]
[13–1707.
(a) (1) Notwithstanding the license population quota limitations established
by the Board and in addition to the licenses authorized for issuance in the county, the Board
may authorize the transfer of the number of Class B and Class D beer, wine, and liquor
(on–sale) retail licenses in existence in Election District 15 on January 15, 2005, and valid
on the date of transfer, in accordance with the following schedule:
(i) two to the Quarry at Greenspring, to be known as (QG) licenses,
on or after April 1, 2005, located at lots 1 through 9, inclusive, identified on the plat of
Greenspring Quarry, areas F, G, and K, dated December 21, 2004, and delivered to the
county for recording on December 29, 2004;
(ii) three to the area of State–owned land adjacent to and abutting
the Owings Mills Metro Station, governed by a master development agreement creating the
Metro Center at Owings Mills, to be known as (MCOM) licenses, on or after October 1, 2005;
and
(iii) three to the Promenade at Catonsville, to be known as (PC)
licenses, on or after April 1, 2006, located at and identified by the State Department of
Assessments and Taxation map 101, parcels 132, 516, 1088, 1344, 1804, and 1985.
(2) A license transferred from Election District 15 under this section:
(i) may not be a Class A or Class C license or a license that is
prohibited from being transferred by law or local regulation other than the prohibition
against crossing district lines;
(ii) for determining the total number of licenses available in an
election district, shall be considered to be a regular license in its new location and not an
exception to the population and numerical limitations specified in “Rule 19 – Population
and Numerical Limitations” of the Rules and Regulations of the Board;
(iii) shall be converted into a Class B (QG), (MCOM), or (PC) license;
and
(iv) as of the date of transfer, may not be counted toward any
population limit existing in Election District 15.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the license issuance and
renewal requirements, minimum square foot area requirement for food and beverage
preparation and consumption, and days and hours of sale for a Class B (QG), (MCOM), or
(PC) restaurant (on–sale) beer, wine, and liquor retail license are the same as those
– 7 –

Ch. 832 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
provided for in this article and in the regulations of the Board for a Class B beer, wine, and
liquor (on–sale) hotel and restaurant license.
(c) (1) A Class B (QG), (MCOM), or (PC) restaurant (on–sale) beer, wine, and
liquor retail license may be issued only for a location within the geographic areas identified
in subsection (a)(1) of this section.
(2) The license shall be used in conjunction with the operation of a
restaurant, as defined in this article and the regulations of the Board.
(3) The restaurant operation shall maintain average daily receipts from
the sale of food of at least 60% of the total daily receipts of the establishment.
(4) The total seating capacity for the area dedicated primarily for the
consumption of alcoholic beverages may not exceed 25% of the total seating capacity of the
establishment.
(5) Subject to subsection (d)(5) of this section, the hours during which the
privileges conferred by the license may be exercised may not exceed the hours for which
food is offered for sale.
(d) (1) A Class B (QG), (MCOM), or (PC) restaurant (on–sale) beer, wine, and
liquor retail license authorizes on–premises consumption.
(2) Once issued, the license may not be:
(i) transferred to a new location outside the geographic area, as
defined in subsection (a)(1) of this section, for which the license was issued; or
(ii) converted into any other class of license.
(3) Paragraph (2) of this subsection does not prohibit the transfer of:
(i) the ownership of a license; or
(ii) the location of a licensed establishment within the geographic
area as defined in subsection (a)(1) of this section.
(4) The premises shall comply with all applicable zoning regulations.
(5) Alcoholic beverages may be sold in the establishment only until 1:30
a.m.]
[13–1709.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 832
(a) (1) Notwithstanding any license quota limitation established by the Board
and in addition to the licenses authorized for issuance in the county, the Board may
authorize the transfer of one Class B or Class D beer, wine, and liquor license in existence
in Election District 15 on January 15, 2016, and valid on the date of transfer, to a location
that is:
(i) at 2200 York Road and surrounding grounds in Election District
8; and
(ii) owned by the Maryland State Fair and Agricultural Society, Inc.
(2) A license transferred under this section:
(i) may not be a license that is prohibited from being transferred by
law or Board regulation, other than a prohibition against crossing district lines;
(ii) for determining the total number of licenses available in Election
District 8, shall be considered to be a regular license and not an exception to the population
and numerical limitations specified in “Rule 19 – Population and Numerical Limitations”
of the Rules and Regulations of the Board;
(iii) shall be converted into a Class B (MSF)(on–sale) beer, wine, and
liquor license; and
(iv) as of the date of transfer, may not be counted toward any
population limit existing in Election District 15.
(b) The issuance and renewal requirements, minimum square foot area
requirement for food and beverage preparation and consumption, and hours and days of
sale for the Class B (MSF) license are the same as those provided for a Class B beer, wine,
and liquor (on–sale) hotel and restaurant license.
(c) (1) The Class B (MSF) license may not be:
(i) transferred to a location outside the area for which the license
was issued; or
(ii) converted into another class of license.
(2) The location for the Class B (MSF) license shall comply with all
applicable zoning regulations.]
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any license
population quota limitation established by the Board of License Commissioners for
Baltimore County, the following Class B beer, wine, and liquor licenses in existence on July
– 9 –

Ch. 832 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1, 2026, shall be converted into Class B hotel and restaurant licenses under § 13–902 of the
Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article:
(1) Class B (Towson Commercial Revitalization District) licenses under §
13–1705 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article;
(2) Class B (HV) restaurant (on–sale) licenses under § 13–1706 of the
Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article;
(3) Class B (QG), (MCOM), or (PC) restaurant (on–sale) licenses under §
13–1707 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article;
(4) Class B (MSF) (on–sale) licenses under § 13–1709 of the Alcoholic
Beverages and Cannabis Article;
(5) Class B (OMTC) (on–sale) licenses established under Chapter 423 of
the Acts of the General Assembly of 1996; and
(6) Class B (TRD) restaurant (on–sale) licenses established under Chapter
365 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2003.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect October 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Section 4 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 10 –